Utah statutes.
62A-1-114.   Department is state agency for specified federal programs -- Development of state plans and programs.

(1)  The department shall be the social services authority of the state, and shall be the sole state agency for administration of federally-assisted state programs or plans such as the social services block grant, low income energy assistance program block grant, alcohol, drug, and mental health block grant, child welfare, refugee assistance, and state programs supported under the Older Americans Act, 42 U.S.C.  Sections 3001 et seq.

(2)  State plans and programs administered by the department shall be developed in the appropriate divisions and offices of the department, in accordance with the policy of the appropriate boards, and are subject to approval or change by the executive director to achieve coordination, efficiency, or economy.



Amended by Chapter 375, 1997 General Session

